dev/redux/apertium-mal.mal.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>
%<v%>
%<det%>
%<adj%>
%<vbcop%>
%<adj%>

%<sg%>
%<pl%>

%<subst%>
%<attr%>

%<nom%>
%<gen%>

%<tv%> 
%<iv%>

%<past%>
%<pres%>

%{യ%}
%{അ%}
%{A%}
%+              ! Clitic/compound boundary    !
%>              ! Morpheme boundary           !
%»              ! Clitic boundary
%               ! Space symbol                !

LEXICON Root

Determiners ;
Nouns ; 
Verbs ; 
VBCOP ;
Adjectives ;

LEXICON K

%+:%»%{യ%} Root ; 
# ; 

LEXICON A !sandhi for adjective
%+:%»%{അ%} Root ; 
# ; 

LEXICON N-MRIGAM 

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ം K ; ! "ṁ"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<v%>: K ; ! "ṁ"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ങ്ങള്‍ K ; ! "ṅṅaḷ‍"
%<n%>%<attr%>: A ; ! ""

!LEXICON N-KKALAM

!%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>ം K ; ! "ṁ"
!%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ങ്ങള്‍ K ; ! "ṅṅaḷ‍"
!%<n%>%<attr%>:K ; ! ""

LEXICON N-THALA

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: K ; ! "ṁ"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>കള്‍ K ; ! "ṅṅaḷ‍"
%<n%>%<attr%>: A ; ! ""


LEXICON VBCOP-UNTU 

%<vbcop%>%<pres%>:ണ്ട് K ; ! "ṇṭ"

!LEXICON V-TV-LABHIKKUKA

!%<v%>%<tv%>: K ; 


LEXICON V-PAST-I

%<past%>:%>ി K ; ! ""

LEXICON V-PAST-II

%<past%>:%>ണ്ടു K ; ! ""

LEXICON V-IV-VIRALUKA

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-PAST-II ; 

LEXICON V-IV-VEIKUKA

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-PAST-I ; 


LEXICON DET-XXX

%<det%>: K ; 

LEXICON VBCOP-AAK

%<vbcop%>%<fut%>:കും #;

LEXICON VBCOP-UNTU

%<vbcop%>%<pres%>:ണ്ട് #;

LEXICON A1 

%<adj%>: A ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VBCOP

ആക്:ആ VBCOP-AAK;  ! "FIXME" !debug
ഉണ്ട്:ഉ VBCOP-UNTU ; ! "uṇṭ" ! "have"

LEXICON Determiners

എല്ലാം:എല്ലാം DET-XXX ; ! "ellāṁ" ! "all"

LEXICON Nouns 

മഴക്കാലം:മഴക്കാല N-MRIGAM ; ! "mēghaṁ" ! "cloud"
മ്രിഗം:മ്രിഗ N-MRIGAM ; ! "mrigaṁ" ! "animal"
ഓണം:ഓണ N-MRIGAM ; ! "oaanam" ! "oanam"
മേഘം:മേഘ N-MRIGAM ; ! "mēghaṁ" ! "cloud"
!മഴക്കാലം:മഴക്കാല N-THALA ; ! "maḻakkālaṁ" ! "rainy season"
തല:തല N-THALA ; ! "tala" ! "head"
വഴി:വഴി N-THALA ; ! "vaḻi" ! "path"
കൈ:കൈ N-THALA ; ! "vaḻi" ! "hand"

LEXICON Verbs 

ഉണ്ട്:ഉ VBCOP-UNTU ; ! "uṇṭ" ! "have"

ഇരുളുക:ഇരു V-IV-VIRALUKA ; ! "iruḷuka" ! "darken"
കൂടുക:കൂട V-IV-VEIKUKA ; ! "kūṭuka" ! "be together"
LEXICON Adjectives 

തിരു:തിരു A1 ; ! "tiru" ! "~important"


! മേഘങ്ങളെല്ലാം‌
! മേഘങ്ങളെല്ലാം
